Washington statutes.
RCW 8.26.105

Use of funds.

(1) Funds appropriated or otherwise available to a state agency or local public agency for the acquisition of real property or an interest therein for a particular program or project shall also be available to carry out the provisions of this chapter as applied to that program or project.

(2) No payment or assistance under this chapter may be required to be made to any person or included as a program or project cost under this section, if the person receives a payment required by federal, state, or local law that is determined by the head of the displacing agency to have substantially the same purpose and effect as that payment under this chapter.

[ 1988 c 90 s 10.]

NOTES:

Section captions—1988 c 90: See note following RCW 8.26.010.